Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-706
Intersections between railroads and highways; crossing of wires; clearance.

If any wire crosses over railroad track, in no case shall the commission prescribe a less clearance than twenty-five feet above the rails under the most unfavorable conditions of temperature and loading for all wires except electric wires for trolley cars, and such wires shall not be placed at a height of less than twenty-two feet from the top of the rails.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. VII, § 6, p. 1423;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 118.